Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limits for payment
of expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  ex-
cluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received  by the State Treasurer, for the
following purposes:
(1) Administrative services ............ $ 37,502,399
(2) Trust property services ............ $  9,799,045
(3) Investment services .................. $ 48,914,283
(4) Public savings services ............. $ 11,773,776
(5) State and local government
financial services ...................... $ 20,734,083
SECTION 2. For the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, expenditures by the State Treasurer
for trust property audit fees, investment expenses and costs incurred on  behalf of estates
are not limited.
SECTION 3. This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2023 Act takes effect
July 1, 2023.
Enrolled House Bill 5042 (HB 5042-A) Page 1
Passed by House June 7, 2023
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 23, 2023
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 5042 (HB 5042-A) Page 2